Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 653.307 is amended to read:
653.307. (1)  In accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Bureau of
Labor and Industries shall adopt rules governing  annual employment certificates required under this
section. After September 9,  1995, the rules governing the total hours a minor can work may not be
[more] less restrictive than the requirements of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. 201,
et seq.),  [ unless otherwise provided by Oregon law ] as in effect on January 1, 2026, but may be
more restrictive only  as necessary to implement or conform to changes in the federal Act
or state law that increase protections for minors .
(2) An employer who hires minors shall apply to the bureau for an annual employment certif-
icate to employ minors. The application shall be on a  form provided by the bureau and shall include,
but need not be limited to:
(a) The estimated or average number of minors to be employed during the year.
(b) A description of the activities to be performed.
(c) A description of the machinery or other equipment to be used by the minors.
(3) Once a year, the bureau  shall provide to all employers applying for an annual employment
certificate an information sheet summarizing  all rules and laws governing the employment of minors.
(4) Failure by an employer to comply with ORS  653.305 to 653.340 or with the regulations
adopted by the bureau  pursuant to this section shall subject the employer to revocation of the right
to hire minors in the future at the  discretion of the bureau, provided that an employer shall be
granted a hearing before the bureau prior to such action being taken.
(5) All school districts shall cooperate with the bureau and make  available, upon request of the
bureau, information concerning the age and schooling of minors.
Enrolled House Bill 4013 (HB 4013-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4013 (HB 4013-INTRO) Page 2